Nebraska, session 109, LB361.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB361 LB361
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) It shall be an unlawful employment practice for a
covered entity to discriminate or retaliate against an individual because
such individual has reported a work-related injury, brought a claim, or
sought remedies under the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act.
(2) The rights and remedies provided by the Nebraska Fair Employment
Practice Act are supplemental to those provided in the Nebraska Workers'
Compensation Act.
Sec. 2. In any civil action brought under the Nebraska Fair
Employment Practice Act, there shall be a right to a jury trial,
including in cases brought against state and governmental agencies.
Sec. 3. Section 48-1126, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-1126 The state and governmental agencies created by the state may
be sued upon claims arising under the Nebraska Fair Employment Practice
Act in the same manner as provided by such law for suits against other
employers.
Sec. 4. Section 48-1125, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-1125 Sections 48-1101 to 48-1125 and sections 1 to 3 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Fair Employment Practice
Act.
Sec. 5. Original sections 48-1125 and 48-1126, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-2-